Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.191

Milk or milk product analysis—Report of violative results.

After obtaining a sample of milk or milk product for analysis, the department shall, within ten days of obtaining the result of the analysis, send any violative results to the person from whom the sample was taken or to the person responsible for the condition of the milk.

[ 1999 c 291 s 11; 1994 c 143 s 304; 1989 c 354 s 11; 1961 c 11 s 15.32.530. Prior: 1907 c 234 s 12; RRS s 6278. Formerly RCW 15.32.530.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.